District of Columbia statutes.
38-906

Title and jurisdiction over reservation 277-F transferred for school purposes; authority to close streets and alleys.

Title to and jurisdiction over reservation 277-F, being part of square 3526, are transferred to the District of Columbia, the said reservation to be included in the site acquired or to be acquired for the McKinley Technical High School; and the Council of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized and directed to close all streets and alleys in the area acquired or to be acquired for the McKinley Technical High School and the Langley Junior High School buildings and grounds, where title to the property on both sides of any such streets or alleys shall be in the District of Columbia, the title to the land in such streets or alleys so closed to revert to the District of Columbia for school purposes.

Mar. 4, 1925, 43 Stat. 1320, ch. 556

History

1981 Ed., § 31-2206.
1973 Ed., § 31-1108.

Prior Codifications